North Carolina, session 2025, HB945.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-12(21) reads as rewritten:
"(21) Duty to Monitor Acts of School Violence. – The State Board of Education
shall monitor and compile an annual a biannual report on acts of violence in
the public schools.schools in accordance with the following:
a. The State Board shall adopt standard definitions for acts of school
violence and shall require local boards of education to report them
within five days of the act occurring to the State Board in a standard
format adopted by the State Board. The State Board shall require local
boards of education to specify in their reports if an act of violence
occurred on a school bus and the State Board shall include this data in
the reports required under this subdivision. Failure of an employee of
a local school administrative unit or a member of a local board of
education to make a report to the State Board as required by this
sub-subdivision is a Class I felony.
b. The State Board shall submit its report on acts of violence in the public
schools to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the
House of Representatives, and the Joint Legislative Education
Oversight Committee by March 15 of each year.at the end of the
second and fourth quarters of each school year.
c. Reports submitted pursuant to this subdivision are public record,
except that any sensitive identifying information from the report shall
be redacted for the privacy of minors."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
*H945-v-1*